Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2442.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 6848SV (1) 91 ms/js S.F. 2442 Section 1. Section 335.3, subsection 1, Code 2026, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 1. a. Subject to section 335.2 and paragraph âbâ , the 3 board of supervisors may by ordinance regulate and restrict the 4 height, number of structures, and size of buildings and other 5 structures, the percentage of lot that may be occupied, the 6 size of yards, courts, and other open spaces, the density of 7 population, and the location and use of buildings, structures, 8 and land for trade, industry, residence, or other purposes, and 9 may regulate, restrict, and prohibit the use for residential 10 purposes of tents, trailers, and portable or potentially 11 portable structures. However, such powers shall be exercised 12 only with reference to land and structures located within the 13 county but lying outside of the corporate limits of any city. 14 b. (1) The board of supervisors shall not restrict the 15 construction or development of residential buildings. The 16 board of supervisors may by ordinance regulate residential 17 buildings to the extent necessary for the safety of life or 18 property, but shall not otherwise impose any regulations 19 related to residential buildings that has the effect of 20 restricting the construction or development of residential 21 buildings. 22 (2) For purposes of this paragraph, âresidential buildingâ 23 means the same as defined in section 414.1, subsection 1, 24 paragraph âhâ , subparagraph (2). 25